Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-950
Medicaid Prescription Drug Act, how cited.

Sections 68-950 to 68-956 shall be known and may be cited as the Medicaid Prescription Drug Act.

Laws 2008, LB830, § 2.